California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(2) The Legislature finds and declares that a program that provides a stable source of monetary incentives for eligible solar energy systems will encourage private investment sufficient to make solar technologies cost effective.

(d) (1) The commission shall not impose any charge upon the consumption of natural gas, or upon natural gas ratepayers, to fund the California Solar Initiative.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any charge imposed to fund the program adopted
 and implemented pursuant to this section shall be imposed upon all customers not participating in the California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) or family electric rate assistance (FERA) programs, including those residential customers subject to the rate limitation specified in Section 739.9 for existing baseline quantities or usage up to 130 percent of existing baseline quantities of electricity.

(3) The costs of the program adopted and implemented pursuant to this section shall not be recovered from customers participating in the California Alternate Rates for Energy or CARE program established pursuant to Section 739.1, except to the extent that program costs are recovered out of the nonbypassable system benefits charge authorized pursuant to Section 399.8.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (f), in implementing the California Solar Initiative, the commission shall ensure
 that the total cost over the duration of the program does not exceed three billion five hundred fifty million eight hundred thousand dollars ($3,550,800,000). Except as provided in subdivision (f), financial components of the California Solar Initiative shall consist of the following:

(1) Programs under the supervision of the commission funded by charges collected from customers of San Diego Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and Pacific Gas and Electric Company. Except as provided in subdivision (f), the total cost over the duration of these programs shall not exceed two billion three hundred sixty-six million eight hundred thousand dollars ($2,366,800,000) and includes moneys collected directly into a tracking account for support of the California Solar Initiative.

(2) Programs adopted, implemented, and financed in the amount of seven hundred
 eighty-four million dollars ($784,000,000), by charges collected by local publicly owned electric utilities pursuant to Section 2854. Nothing in this subdivision shall give the commission power and jurisdiction with respect to a local publicly owned electric utility or its customers.

(3) (A) Programs for the installation of solar energy systems on new construction (New Solar Homes Partnership Program), administered by the Energy Commission, and funded by charges in the amount of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000), collected from customers of San Diego Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and Pacific Gas and Electric Company. If the commission is notified by the Energy Commission that funding available pursuant to Section 25751 of the Public Resources Code for the New Solar Homes Partnership Program and any other funding for the purposes of this paragraph have been exhausted, the commission
 may require an electrical corporation to continue administration of the program pursuant to the guidelines established for the program by the Energy Commission, until the funding limit authorized by this paragraph has been reached. The commission may determine whether a third party, including the Energy Commission, should administer the utility’s continuation of the New Solar Homes Partnership Program. The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall supervise the administration of the continuation of the New Solar Homes Partnership Program by an electrical corporation or third-party administrator. After the exhaustion of funds, the Energy Commission shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to the continuation of the program. This subparagraph shall become inoperative on June 1, 2018.

(B) If the commission requires a continuation of the program pursuant to subparagraph (A), any funding made available
 pursuant to the continuation program shall be encumbered through the issuance of rebate reservations by no later than June 1, 2018, and disbursed by no later than December 31, 2021.

(4) The changes made to this subdivision by Chapter 39 of the Statutes of 2012 do not authorize the levy of a charge or any increase in the amount collected pursuant to any existing charge, nor do the changes add to, or detract from, the commission’s existing authority to levy or increase charges.

(f) Upon the expenditure or reservation in any electrical corporation’s service territory of the amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) for low-income residential housing programs pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2852, the commission shall authorize the continued collection of the charge for the purposes of Section 2852. The commission shall ensure that the total amount collected pursuant
 to this subdivision does not exceed one hundred eight million dollars ($108,000,000). Upon approval by the commission, an electrical corporation may use amounts collected pursuant to subdivision (e) for purposes of funding the general market portion of the California Solar Initiative, that remain unspent and unencumbered after December 31, 2016, to reduce the electrical corporation’s portion of the total amount collected pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 24, Sec. 41) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 612, Sec. 57.   (SB 697)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2851.1.

(a) As used in this section,“discount rate” means a financial mechanism that provides a given amount of interest as an offset to the loss of the time value of money on solar projects that receive performance-based incentives under Section 2851.

(b) Before collecting additional ratepayer funds to fund program shortfalls identified for incentive step levels 8, 9, and 10 for nonresidential solar
 photovoltaic systems, the commission shall first allocate interest accumulated from customer collections and, for the remainder of the shortfall, increase collections from customers of San Diego Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and Pacific Gas and Electric Company for programs described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 2851.

(c) The discount rate shall be set at 4 percent, unless the commission determines the rate should be reduced.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 312, Sec. 2.   (SB 585)   Effective September 22, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

2851.5.

(a) A school district or community college district may request an extension of a reservation expiration date for monetary incentives for a solar energy system. The commission may grant a maximum of three extensions of 180 calendar days for each extension.

(b) An extension request pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made in writing, submitted to the program administrators, and shall include a written explanation of the need for the extension and the amount of additional time
 needed. In describing the need for the time extension request, the school district or community college district shall provide information on the circumstances, that are beyond the control of the district, that prevent the solar energy system from being installed as previously described in the initial reservation request. A failure to submit the incentive claim form package by the original or extended reservation expiration date shall result in the cancellation of the request.

(c) An approval of a request for a change in the reservation expiration date for monetary incentives for a solar energy system shall not modify any other condition of a reservation for incentives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 542, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2852.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Affordable housing cost,” “affordable rent,” and “lower income households” have the same meanings as in those set forth in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 50050) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “California Solar Initiative” means the program providing ratepayer-funded incentives for eligible solar energy systems adopted by the Public Utilities Commission in Decision 05-12-044 and Decision 06-01-024.

(3) “Low-income residential housing” means any of the following:

(A) A multifamily residential complex financed with low-income housing tax credits, tax-exempt mortgage revenue bonds, general obligation bonds, or local, state, or federal loans or grants, and for which either of the following applies:

(i) The rents of the occupants who are lower income households do not exceed those prescribed by deed restrictions or regulatory agreements pursuant to the terms of the financing or financial assistance.

(ii) The affordable units have been or will be initially sold at an affordable housing cost to a lower income household and those units are subject to a resale restriction or equity sharing agreement pursuant to the terms of the financing or financial assistance.

(B) A multifamily residential complex in which at least 20 percent of the total housing units are sold or rented to lower income households and either of the following applies:

(i) The rental housing units targeted for lower income households are subject to a deed restriction or affordability covenant with a public entity or nonprofit housing provider organized under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that has as its stated purpose in its articles of incorporation on file with the office of the Secretary of State to provide affordable housing to lower
 income households that ensures that the units will be available at an affordable rent for a period of at least 30 years.

(ii) The housing units have been or will be initially sold at an affordable cost to a lower income household and those units are subject to a resale restriction or equity sharing agreement, for which the homeowner does not receive a greater share of equity than described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 65915 of the Government Code, with a public entity or nonprofit housing provider organized under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that has as its stated purpose in its articles of incorporation on file with the office of the Secretary of State to provide affordable housing to lower income households.

(C) An individual residence sold at an affordable housing cost to a lower income household that is subject to a resale restriction or
 equity sharing agreement, for which the homeowner does not receive a greater share of equity than described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 65915 of the Government Code, with a public entity or nonprofit housing provider organized under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code that has as its stated purpose in its articles of incorporation on file with the office of the Secretary of State to provide affordable housing to lower income households.

(4) “Solar energy system” means a solar energy device that has the primary purpose of providing for the collection and distribution of solar energy for the generation of electricity, that produces at least one kilowatt, and produces not more than five megawatts, alternating current rated peak electricity, and that meets or exceeds the eligibility criteria established by the commission or the Energy Commission.

(b) In
 establishing the California Solar Initiative, no moneys shall be diverted from any existing programs for low-income ratepayers, or from cost-effective energy efficiency or demand response programs.

(c) (1) The commission shall ensure that not less than 10 percent of the funds for the California Solar Initiative, as specified in subdivision (e) of, or moneys collected pursuant to subdivision (f) of, Section 2851, are utilized for the installation of solar energy systems on low-income residential housing. Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may modify the monetary incentives made available pursuant to the California Solar Initiative to accommodate the limited financial resources of low-income residential housing.

(2) The commission may incorporate a revolving loan or loan guarantee program into the California Solar Initiative for low-income
 residential housing. All loans outstanding as of January 1, 2022, shall continue to be repaid consistent with the terms and conditions of the program adopted and implemented by the commission pursuant to this subdivision, until repaid in full.

(3) All moneys set aside for the purpose of funding the installation of solar energy systems on low-income residential housing that are unexpended and unencumbered on January 1, 2022, and all moneys thereafter repaid pursuant to paragraph (2), except to the extent those moneys are encumbered pursuant to this section, shall be utilized to augment existing cost-effective energy efficiency measures in low-income residential housing that benefit ratepayers.

(d) In supervising a program implementing the California Solar Initiative pursuant to this section, the commission shall ensure that the program does all of the following:

(1) Is designed to maximize the overall benefit to ratepayers.

(2) Requires participants who receive monetary incentives to enroll in the Energy Savings Assistance Program established pursuant to Section 382, if eligible.

(3) Provides job training and employment opportunities in the solar energy and energy efficiency sectors of the economy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 609, Sec. 3.   (AB 217)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2854.

(a) In order to further the state goal of encouraging the installation of 3,000 megawatts of photovoltaic solar energy in California within 10 years, the governing body of a local publicly owned electric utility that sells electricity at retail, shall adopt, implement, and finance a solar initiative program, funded in accordance with subdivision (b), for the purpose of investing in, and encouraging the increased installation of, residential and commercial solar energy systems.

(b) On or before January 1, 2008, a local publicly owned electric utility shall offer monetary incentives for the installation of solar energy systems of at least two dollars and eighty cents ($2.80) per installed watt, or for the electricity produced by the solar energy system, measured in
 kilowatthours, as determined by the governing board of a local publicly owned electric utility, for photovoltaic solar energy systems. The incentive level shall decline each year thereafter at a rate of no less than an average of 7 percent per year.

(c) A local publicly owned electric utility shall initiate a public proceeding to fund a solar energy program to adequately support the goal of installing 3,000 megawatts of photovoltaic solar energy in California. The proceeding shall determine what additional funding, if any, is necessary to provide the incentives pursuant to subdivision (b). The public proceeding shall be completed and the comprehensive solar energy program established by January 1, 2008.

(d) The solar energy program of a local publicly owned electric utility shall be consistent with all of the following:

(1) That a solar energy system receiving monetary incentives comply with the eligibility criteria, design, installation, and electrical output standards or incentives established by the Energy Commission pursuant to Section 25782 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) That solar energy systems receiving monetary incentives are intended primarily to offset part or all of the consumer’s own electricity demand.

(3) That all components in the solar energy system are new and unused, and have not previously been placed in service in any other location or for any other application.

(4) That the solar energy system has a warranty of not less than 10 years to protect against defects and undue degradation of electrical generation output.

(5) That the
 solar energy system be located on the same premises of the end-use consumer where the consumer’s own electricity demand is located.

(6) That the solar energy system be connected to the local publicly owned electric utility’s electrical distribution system within the state.

(7) That the solar energy system has meters or other devices in place to monitor and measure the system’s performance and the quantity of electricity generated by the system.

(8) That the solar energy system be installed in conformance with the manufacturer’s specifications and in compliance with all applicable electrical and building code standards.

(e) In establishing the program required by this section, no moneys shall be diverted from any existing programs for low-income
 ratepayers, or from cost-effective energy efficiency or demand response programs.

(f) The statewide expenditures for solar programs adopted, implemented, and financed by local publicly owned electric utilities shall be seven hundred eighty-four million dollars ($784,000,000). The expenditure level for each local publicly owned electric utility shall be based on that utility’s percentage of the total statewide load served by all local publicly owned electric utilities. Expenditures by a local publicly owned electric utility may be less than the utility’s cap amount, provided that funding is adequate to provide the incentives required by subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 37.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2854.5.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (5) of subdivision (d) of Section 2854, a local publicly owned electric utility may adopt, implement, and finance a solar initiative program otherwise in accordance with that section, using monetary incentives authorized by subdivision (b) of Section 2854, to residential and business consumers where consumers offset part or all of their electricity demand with electricity generated by a solar energy system not located on the premises of the consumer, if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The solar energy system meets all of the following conditions:

(1) It is located within the service territory of the local publicly owned electric utility.

(2) It has a capacity of no more than five megawatts.

(3) It is interconnected to the local publicly owned electric utility’s system at the distribution level.

(b) The local publicly owned electric utility meets all of the following conditions:

(1) It provides monetary incentives authorized by Section 2854 for not more than the first megawatt of generating capacity of each solar energy system.

(2) It has contracted to purchase the total electricity produced by the solar energy system or owns the solar energy system.

(3) It provides no greater incentive per watt for the solar energy system than provided for by systems that
 participate in the applicable solar initiative program established under Section 2854.

(4) It has received approval for the solar energy system from its governing board at a publicly noticed and held meeting.

(c) The total megawatt capacity of solar energy systems eligible for a local publicly owned electric utility program under this section is both of the following:

(1) Not more than the total megawatt capacity of the combined residential and commercial solar energy systems installed in the service area of the local publicly owned electric utility after July 1, 2010, that participate in the applicable solar initiative programs established under Section 2854.

(2) Not more than 20 percent of the proportionate amount for the local publicly owned electric
 utility of the overall 3,000 megawatt state goal set forth in Section 2854, based on the percentage of the total statewide load served by that entity.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 387.8 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 263.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2854.6.

(a) On or before July 1, 2019, the commission shall develop standardized inputs and assumptions to be used in the calculation and presentation of electric utility bill savings to a consumer that can be expected by using a solar energy system by vendors, installers, or financing
 entities, and the commission and each electrical corporation shall post these standardized inputs and assumptions on their Internet Web sites.

(b) For purposes of this section, “solar energy system” means a solar energy device to be installed on a residential building that has the primary purpose of providing for the collection and distribution of solar energy for the generation of electricity, that produces at least one kW, and not more than five MW, alternating current rated peak electricity, and that meets or exceeds the eligibility criteria established pursuant to Section 25782 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 662, Sec. 3.   (AB 1070)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Independent Solar Energy Producers [2868. - 2869.]

2868.

The following definitions shall apply for purposes of this article:

(a) “Electric utility” means an electrical corporation as defined in Section 218, a local publicly owned electric utility as defined in Section 9604, or an electrical cooperative as defined in Section 2776.

(b) “Independent solar energy producer” means a corporation or person employing one or more solar energy systems for the generation of electricity for any one or
 more of the following purposes:

(1) Its own use or the use of its tenants.

(2) The use of, or sale to, not more than two other entities or persons per generation system solely for use on the real property on which the electricity is generated, or on real property immediately adjacent thereto.

(c) “Real property” means a single parcel of land.

(d) “Solar energy system” means any configuration of solar energy devices that collects and distributes solar energy for the purpose of generating electricity and that has a single interconnection with the electric utility transmission or distribution network.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 535, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

2869.

(a) (1) An independent solar energy producer contracting for the use or sale of electricity or the lease of a solar energy system, to an entity or person, for use in a residence shall include a disclosure to the buyer or lessee that, at a minimum, includes all of the following:

(A) A good faith estimate of the kilowatthours to be delivered by the solar energy system.

(B) A plain language
 explanation of the terms under which the pricing will be calculated over the life of the contract and a good faith estimate of the price per kilowatthour.

(C) A plain language explanation of operation and maintenance responsibilities of the contract parties.

(D) A plain language explanation of the contract provisions regulating the disposition or transfer of the contract in the event of a transfer of ownership of the residence, as well as the costs or potential costs associated with the disposition or transfer of the contract.

(E) A plain language explanation of the disposition of the solar energy system at the end of the term of the contract.

(2) The commission may require, as a condition of receiving ratepayer funded incentives, that an independent
 solar energy producer provide additional disclosure to the buyer or lessee, the commission, or both.

(b) An independent solar energy producer contracting for the use or sale of electricity or the lease of a solar energy system, to an entity or person, for use in a residence shall record a Notice of an Independent Solar Energy Producer Contract, within 30 days of the signing of the contract, against the title to the real property on which the electricity is generated, and against the title to any adjacent real property on which the electricity will be used, in the office of the county recorder for the county in which the real property is located. The notice shall include all of the following and may include additional information:

(1) (A) If the solar energy system is located on the real property, a prominent title at the top of the document in 14-point type
 stating “Notice of an Independent Solar Energy Producer Contract” and the following statement:

“This real property is receiving part of its electric service from an independent solar energy producer that has retained ownership of a solar electric generation system that is located on the real property. The independent solar energy producer provides electric service to the current owner of this real property through a long-term contract for electric service. The independent solar energy producer is required to provide a copy of the contract to a prospective buyer of the real property within ten (10) days of the receipt of a written request from the current owner of this real property.”

(B) If the solar energy system is located on an adjacent real property, a prominent title at the top of the document in 14-point type stating “Notice of an Independent Solar Energy Producer Contract” and the following
 statement:

“This real property is receiving part of its electric service from an independent solar energy producer that has retained ownership of a solar electric generation system that is located on an adjacent real property. The independent solar energy producer provides electric service to the current owner of this real property through a long-term contract for electric service. The independent solar energy producer is required to provide a copy of the contract to a prospective buyer of this real property within ten (10) days of the receipt of a written request from the current owner of this real property.”

(2) The address and assessor’s parcel number of the real property against which the notice is recorded.

(3) The name, address, and telephone number of the independent solar energy producer, and any other contact information deemed
 necessary by the independent solar energy producer.

(4) A statement identifying whether the contract is a contract for the sale of electricity or for the lease of a solar energy system, and providing the dates on which the contract commences and terminates.

(5) A plain language summary of the potential costs, consequences, and assignment of responsibilities, if any, that could result in the event the contract is terminated.

(c) (1) The recorded Notice of an Independent Solar Energy Producer Contract does not constitute a title defect, lien, or encumbrance against the real property, and the independent solar energy producer shall be solely responsible for the accuracy of the information provided in the notice and for recording the document with the county recorder.

(2) The independent solar energy producer shall record a subsequent document extinguishing the Notice of an Independent Solar Energy Producer Contract if the contract is voided, terminated, sold, assigned, or transferred. If the independent solar energy producer transfers its obligation under the contract or changes its contact information, it shall record a new notice reflecting these changes within 30 days of their occurrence.

(3) Within 30 days of the termination of a contract for the use or sale of electricity or the lease of a solar energy system, the independent solar energy producer shall record a subsequent document extinguishing the Notice of an Independent Solar Energy Producer Contract from the title to the real property on which the electricity is generated, and from the title to any adjacent real property on which the electricity was used, in the office of the county
 recorder for the county in which the real property is located.

(d) An independent solar energy producer contracting for the use or sale of electricity or the lease of a solar energy system shall provide a copy of the existing contract to a prospective buyer of the real property where the electricity is used or generated within ten (10) days of the receipt of a written request from the current owner of the real property.

(e) (1) All contracts for the sale of electricity by an independent solar energy producer to an entity or person, for use in a residential dwelling shall be made available to the commission upon its request, and shall be confidential, except as provided for in this subdivision. The disclosures required by subdivision (a) may be made open to public inspection or made public by the commission.

(2) A contract provided to the commission pursuant to this subdivision shall not be open to public inspection or made public, except on order of the commission, or by the commission or a commissioner in the course of a hearing or proceeding.

(3) This subdivision does not eliminate or modify any rule or provision of law that provides for the confidentiality of information submitted to the commission in the course of its proceedings.

(f) A master-meter customer of an electric utility who purchases electricity or leases a solar energy system from an independent solar energy producer, and who provides electric service to users who are tenants of a mobilehome park, apartment building, or similar residential complex, shall do both of the following:

(1) Charge each user of the electric service that is under a
 submetered system a rate for the solar generated electricity not to exceed the rate charged by the independent solar energy producer or the electric utility’s rate for an equivalent amount of electricity, whichever is lower.

(2) Comply with the provisions of Section 739.5 or 12821.5, and any rules set forth by an electric utility for master-meter customers.

(g) No transfer of real property subject to this article shall be invalidated solely because of the failure of any person to comply with any provision of this article. Any person who willfully or negligently violates or fails to perform any duty prescribed by any provision of this article shall be civilly liable in the amount of actual damages suffered by a transferee or transferor of the real property as a consequence of that violation or failure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 535, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Multifamily Affordable Housing Solar Roofs Program [2870. - 2870.]

2870.

(a) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “CARE program” means the California Alternate Rates for Energy program established pursuant to Section 739.1.

(2) “Program” means the Multifamily Affordable Housing Solar Roofs Program established pursuant to this chapter, which is also known as the Solar on Multifamily Affordable Housing Program.

(3) “Qualified multifamily affordable housing property” means a multifamily residential property of at least five rental housing units that is, or will be, operated to provide deed-restricted low-income
 residential housing, as defined in clause (i) of
 subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2852, and that meets one or more of the following requirements:

(A) The property is located in a disadvantaged community, as identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) At least 66 percent of the households have incomes at or below 80 percent of the area median income, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 50052.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) The property is owned by a tribe.

(D) The property is rental housing property that is owned by one of the following:

(i) A public housing authority created pursuant to the Housing Authorities Law (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 34200) of Part 2 of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code).

(ii) A public housing agency, as defined in Section 1437a of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(4) “Solar energy system” means a solar energy photovoltaic device that meets or exceeds the eligibility criteria established pursuant to Section 25782 of the Public Resources Code.

(5) “Tribe” means a California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) (1) Adoption and implementation of the program may count toward
 the satisfaction of the commission’s obligation to ensure that specific alternatives designed for growth among residential customers in disadvantaged communities are offered as part of the standard contract or tariff authorized pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2827.1.

(2) This section does not preclude electrical corporations from offering and administering a distributed energy resource program, including solar energy systems, in disadvantaged communities offered under current or proposed programs using funds provided under subdivision (c) of Section 748.5 or programs proposed to comply with paragraph (1) as approved by the commission.

(c) The commission shall annually authorize the allocation of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) or 66.67 percent of available
 funds, whichever is less, from the revenues described in subdivision (c) of Section 748.5 for the program, beginning with the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2016, and ending with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2020. The commission shall continue authorizing the allocation of these funds through June 30, 2026, if the commission determines that revenues are available after 2020 and that there is adequate interest and participation in the program.

(d) The commission shall consider the most appropriate program administration structure, including administration by a qualified third-party administrator, selected by the commission through a competitive bidding process, or administration by an electrical corporation, in an existing or future proceeding.

(e) Not more than 10 percent of the
 funds allocated to the program shall be used for administration.

(f) (1) By June 30, 2017, the commission shall authorize the award of monetary incentives for qualifying solar energy systems that are installed on qualified multifamily affordable housing properties through December 31, 2032. The target of the program is to install a combined generating capacity of at least 300 megawatts on qualified properties.

(2) The commission shall require that the electricity generated by qualifying renewable energy systems installed pursuant to the program be primarily used to offset electricity usage by low-income tenants. These requirements may include required covenants and restrictions in deeds.

(3) The commission shall require that qualifying solar energy systems owned by third-party owners are subject to contractual restrictions to ensure that no additional costs for the system be passed on to low-income tenants at the properties receiving incentives pursuant to the program. The commission shall require third-party owners of solar energy systems to provide ongoing operations and maintenance of the system, monitor energy production, and, where necessary, take appropriate action to ensure that the kWh production levels projected for the system are achieved throughout the period of the third-party agreement. Those actions may include, but are not limited to, providing a performance guarantee of annual production levels or taking corrective actions to resolve underproduction problems.

(4) The commission shall ensure
 that incentive levels for photovoltaic installations receiving incentives through the program are aligned with the installation costs for solar energy systems for affordable housing and take account of federal investment tax credits and contributions from other sources to the extent feasible.

(5) The commission shall require that no individual installation receive incentives at a rate greater than 100 percent of the total system installation costs.

(6) The commission shall establish local hiring requirements for the program to provide economic development benefits to
 disadvantaged communities.

(7) The commission shall establish energy efficiency requirements that are equal to the energy efficiency requirements established for the program described in Section 2852, including participation in a federal, state, or utility-funded energy efficiency program or documentation of a recent energy efficiency retrofit.

(8) For purposes of the new construction of qualified multifamily affordable housing property, moneys authorized through the program shall not be used to meet the requirements of Part 6 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations.

(g) (1) The commission shall ensure that electrical corporation tariff
 structures affecting the low-income tenants participating in the program continue to provide a direct economic benefit from the qualifying solar energy system.

(2) If units are separately metered, low-income tenants who participate in the program shall receive credits on utility bills from the program. The commission shall ensure that utility bill reductions are achieved through tariffs that allow for the allocation of credits, such as virtual net metering tariffs designed for program participants, or other tariffs that may be adopted by the commission pursuant to Section 2827.1.

(h) This chapter is not intended to supplant CARE program rates as the primary mechanism for achieving the goals of the CARE program.

(i) The commission shall determine the eligibility of qualified multifamily affordable housing property tenants that are customers of community choice aggregators.

(j) The commission may consider authorizing an advance payment loan to an eligible project if there is reasonable evidence to suggest that an advance payment loan would lead to the delivery of a project that would not occur absent the advance payment loan, so long as appropriate funding guarantee and loss recovery mechanisms are implemented to limit the risk of liability to the program from making the advance payment loan. The commission, in considering an advance payment loan, may prioritize allocating funding to a project where an advance payment loan will have the greatest impact on project delivery.

(k) (1) Every three years, the commission shall evaluate the program’s expenditures, commitments, uncommitted balances, future demands, performance, and outcomes and shall make any necessary adjustments to the program to ensure the goals of the program are being met. If, upon review, the commission finds there is insufficient participation in the program, the commission may credit uncommitted funds back to ratepayers pursuant to Section 748.5.

(2) The commission shall include in the annual workplan required pursuant to Section 910, an annual update of the program that shall include, but not be limited to, the number of projects approved, number of projects completed,
 number of pending projects awaiting approval, and geographic distribution of the projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.   (SB 355)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Telephone Corporations [2871. - 2899.]



  ARTICLE 1. Automatic Dialing-Announcing Devices [2871. - 2876.]

2871.

As used in this article, “automatic dialing-announcing device” means any automatic equipment which incorporates a storage capability of telephone numbers to be called or a random or sequential number generator capable of producing numbers to be called and the capability, working alone or in conjunction with other equipment, to disseminate a prerecorded message to the telephone number called.
